test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_cissaas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - cissááš: # MLO, ok
    cissááš+N+Sg+Nom: cissááš
    cissááš+N+Sg+Gen: cissáá
    cissááš+N+Sg+Acc: cissáá
    cissááš+N+Sg+Ill: cissáážân
    cissááš+N+Sg+Loc: cissáást
    cissááš+N+Sg+Com: cissáin
    cissááš+N+Sg+Abe: cissááttáá
    cissááš+N+Ess: cissáážin # obs: vuáˊlážin (á)
    cissááš+N+Par: cissáážid # obs: vuáˊlážid (á)
    cissááš+N+Pl+Nom: cissááh
    cissááš+N+Pl+Gen: cissái
    cissááš+N+Pl+Acc: cissáid
    cissááš+N+Pl+Ill: cissáid
    cissááš+N+Pl+Loc: cissáin
    cissááš+N+Pl+Com: cissáiguin
    cissááš+N+Pl+Abe: cissáittáá
    
  Noun - vuálááš: # MLO, ok
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Nom: vuáˊlááš
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Gen: vuáˊláá
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Acc: vuáˊláá
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Ill: vuáˊláážân
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Loc: vuáˊláást
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Com: vuáˊláin
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Abe: vuáˊlááttáá
    vuálááš+N+Ess: vuáˊlážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    vuálááš+N+Par: vuáˊlážid # obs: cissáážid (áá) 
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Nom: vuáˊlááh
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Gen: vuáˊlái
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Acc: vuáˊláid
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Ill: vuáˊláid
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Loc: vuáˊláin
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Com: vuáˊláiguin
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Abe: vuáˊláittáá
    
  Noun - iilooš: # to be checked
    iilooš+N+Sg+Nom: iilooš
    iilooš+N+Sg+Gen: iiluu
    iilooš+N+Sg+Acc: iiluu
    iilooš+N+Sg+Ill: iiloožân       #iložân
    iilooš+N+Sg+Loc: iiluust
    iilooš+N+Sg+Com: iiluin
    iilooš+N+Sg+Abe: iiluuttáá
    iilooš+N+Ess: iložin
    iilooš+N+Par: iložid 
    iilooš+N+Pl+Nom: iiluuh
    iilooš+N+Pl+Gen: iilui
    iilooš+N+Pl+Acc: iiluid
    iilooš+N+Pl+Ill: iiluid
    iilooš+N+Pl+Loc: iiluin
    iilooš+N+Pl+Com: iiluiguin
    iilooš+N+Pl+Abe: iiluittáá
